Indiana, session 2026, HB1414.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-22-10-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.113-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this section and section 2.5 of
this chapter, "governmental entity" means any of the following:
(1) The government of the United States of America.
(2) The state.
(3) A county.
(4) A city.
(5) A town.
(6) A township.
(7) The following, if created by the Constitution of the United
States, the Constitution of the State of Indiana, a statute, an
ordinance, a rule, or an order:
(A) An agency.
(B) A board.
(C) A commission.
(D) A committee.
HB 1414—LS 6924/DI 150


(E) A council.
(F) A department.
(G) A district.
(H) A public body corporate and politic.
(b) As used in this section and section 2.5 of this chapter, "monetary
consideration" means a fee or other charge for permission to go upon
a tract of land. The term does not include:
(1) the gratuitous sharing of game, fish, or other products of the
recreational use of the land;
(2) services rendered for the purpose of wildlife management; or
(3) contributions in kind made for the purpose of wildlife
management.
(c) As used in this section and section 2.5 of this chapter, "owner"
means a governmental entity or another person that:
(1) has a fee interest in;
(2) is a tenant, a lessee, or an occupant of; or
(3) is in control of;
a tract of land.
(d) A person who goes upon or through the premises, including
caves, of another:
(1) with or without permission; and
(2) either:
(A) without the payment of monetary consideration; or
(B) with the payment of monetary consideration directly or
indirectly on the person's behalf by an agency of the state or
federal government;
for the purpose of swimming, camping, hiking, sightseeing, exercising,
cycling, or accessing or departing from a trail, a greenway, or another
similar area, or for any other purpose (other than the purposes
described in section 2.5 of this chapter) does not have an assurance that
the premises are safe for the purpose. is subject to the limitations of
liability granted to the owner of the premises described in
subsection (e).
(e) The owner of the premises does not
(1) assume responsibility; or
(2) incur liability;
for an injury to a person or property caused by an act or failure to act
of other persons using the premises. assume responsibility or incur
liability for an injury or damage to a:
(1) person caused by:
(A) an act; or
(B) the failure to act;
HB 1414—LS 6924/DI 150


of another person using the premises;
(2) person caused by a condition on the land; or
(3) person's property caused by:
(A) the act of another person using the premises; or
(B) a condition on the land.
(f) This section does not affect the following:
(1) Existing Indiana case law on the liability of owners or
possessors of premises with respect to the following:
(A) Business invitees in commercial establishments.
(B) Invited guests.
(1) Business invitees in for-profit establishments.
(2) The attractive nuisance doctrine.
(g) This section does not excuse the owner or occupant of premises
from liability for injury to a person or property caused by a malicious
or an illegal act of the owner or occupant.
SECTION 2. IC 14-23-1-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The department shall
do the following:
(1) Have the care, custody, and control of the forest land owned
by the state, exclusive of state parks.
(2) Adopt necessary rules to properly enforce this chapter.
(3) Establish, operate, and maintain nurseries for the production
of trees to be used in reforestation. The trees may be:
(A) used to reforest land owned by the state;
(B) supplied to owners of private land at a price not exceeding
cost of production; or
(C) used for planting on public roads or land under the terms
that are considered by the department to be for the public
benefit.
(4) Prepare, print, post, or distribute printed matter relating to
forestry.
(5) Make investigations or experiments with regard to forestry
questions.
(6) Subject to the approval of the governor, purchase land and
forests. For the purpose of acquiring land and forests, the
commission may exercise the right of eminent domain in the
manner provided in IC 14-17-3.
(7) Receive and accept, in the name of the people of Indiana, by
gift or devise, the fee or other estate in land or forests.
(8) Examine the forest land owned by the state or by a state
institution for the purpose of advising and cooperating in securing
proper forest management of the land.
HB 1414—LS 6924/DI 150


(9) Employ, with approval of the authorities having control of the
state penal institutions, convicts committed to a penal institution
for the purpose of producing or planting trees, building roads, or
doing other work in the forests and in clearing, draining, or
developing land purchased or acquired by the state for forestry
purposes.
(10) Propagate trees and shrubs for state institutions or for
planting along highways. A common carrier may transport trees
or shrubs grown by the state at a rate less than the established
tariff to and from points within Indiana.
(11) Have the custody of all abstracts of title, papers, contracts, or
related memoranda, except original deeds to the state, for land
purchased or received under this section.
(12) Examine private forest land:
(A) upon request of; and
(B) at the expense of;
the owner for the purpose of advising the owner on the proper
methods of forest management.
(13) Establish recreational fees for individuals accessing and
using state forest land.
(14) Investigate new revenue raising methods to help carry
out the purposes described in IC 14-23-3-4.
(15) Ensure at all times that ten percent (10%) of state forest
acreage consists of forests that are one hundred (100) years or
older.
(16) Ensure at all times that ten percent (10%) of state forest
acreage consists of forests that are twenty (20) years or
younger.
SECTION 3. IC 14-23-3-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) All income
derived from:
(1) the sale of state forest land; or
(2) the sale of products of from state forest land; or
(3) recreational fees for accessing and using state forest land;
shall be deposited in the fund.
(b) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
HB 1414—LS 6924/DI 150


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Natural Resources, to which was
referred House Bill 1414, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 14-22-10-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.113-2019,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this section and section 2.5 of
this chapter, "governmental entity" means any of the following:
(1) The government of the United States of America.
(2) The state.
(3) A county.
(4) A city.
(5) A town.
(6) A township.
(7) The following, if created by the Constitution of the United
States, the Constitution of the State of Indiana, a statute, an
ordinance, a rule, or an order:
(A) An agency.
(B) A board.
(C) A commission.
(D) A committee.
(E) A council.
(F) A department.
(G) A district.
(H) A public body corporate and politic.
(b) As used in this section and section 2.5 of this chapter, "monetary
consideration" means a fee or other charge for permission to go upon
a tract of land. The term does not include:
(1) the gratuitous sharing of game, fish, or other products of the
recreational use of the land;
(2) services rendered for the purpose of wildlife management; or
(3) contributions in kind made for the purpose of wildlife
management.
(c) As used in this section and section 2.5 of this chapter, "owner"
means a governmental entity or another person that:
(1) has a fee interest in;
(2) is a tenant, a lessee, or an occupant of; or
(3) is in control of;
HB 1414—LS 6924/DI 150


a tract of land.
(d) A person who goes upon or through the premises, including
caves, of another:
(1) with or without permission; and
(2) either:
(A) without the payment of monetary consideration; or
(B) with the payment of monetary consideration directly or
indirectly on the person's behalf by an agency of the state or
federal government;
for the purpose of swimming, camping, hiking, sightseeing, exercising,
cycling, or accessing or departing from a trail, a greenway, or another
similar area, or for any other purpose (other than the purposes
described in section 2.5 of this chapter) does not have an assurance that
the premises are safe for the purpose. is subject to the limitations of
liability granted to the owner of the premises described in
subsection (e).
(e) The owner of the premises does not
(1) assume responsibility; or
(2) incur liability;
for an injury to a person or property caused by an act or failure to act
of other persons using the premises. assume responsibility or incur
liability for an injury or damage to a:
(1) person caused by:
(A) an act; or
(B) the failure to act;
of another person using the premises;
(2) person caused by a condition on the land; or
(3) person's property caused by:
(A) the act of another person using the premises; or
(B) a condition on the land.
(f) This section does not affect the following:
(1) Existing Indiana case law on the liability of owners or
possessors of premises with respect to the following:
(A) Business invitees in commercial establishments.
(B) Invited guests.
(1) Business invitees in for-profit establishments.
(2) The attractive nuisance doctrine.
(g) This section does not excuse the owner or occupant of premises
from liability for injury to a person or property caused by a malicious
or an illegal act of the owner or occupant.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
HB 1414—LS 6924/DI 150


(Reference is to HB 1414 as introduced.)
LINDAUER
Committee Vote: yeas 8, nays 3.
HB 1414—LS 6924/DI 150